Indiana, session 2026, HB1349.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-18-2-187.8, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2022,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 187.8. (a) "Indiana governmental entity",
for purposes of IC 16-34-1, has the meaning set forth in
IC 16-34-1-0.7.
(b) "Indiana governmental entity", for purposes of IC 16-39-11, has
the meaning set forth in IC 16-39-11-4.5.
SECTION 2. IC 16-34-1-0.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.7. As used in this chapter, "Indiana
governmental entity" means a:
(1) state agency (as defined in IC 1-1-15-3);
(2) political subdivision (as defined in IC 36-1-2-13); or
(3) municipally owned utility (as defined in IC 8-1-2-1(h)),
joint agency created under IC 8-1-2.2-8, or utility company
owned, operated, or held in trust by a consolidated city.
SECTION 3. IC 16-34-1-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
2026 IN 1349—LS 6888/DI 141


FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) This section
does not apply to a payment made by an Indiana governmental
entity to provide group health insurance for employees of the
Indiana governmental entity.
(b) Neither the state nor any political subdivision of the state An
Indiana governmental entity may not make a payment from any fund
under its control for the:
(1) performance of an abortion; or
(2) costs associated with procuring an abortion, including
travel costs;
unless the abortion is necessary to preserve the life of the pregnant
woman.
SECTION 4. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1349—LS 6888/DI 141